South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4777.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-9-197(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) As used in this section: (1) "Cancer" includes malignant neoplasms of the following body areas and organ systems: (a) central and peripheral nervous system; (b) oropharyngeal; (c) respiratory tract; (d) gastrointestinal tract; (e) hepatobiliary; (f) solid organ and endocrine; (g) genitourinary and male reproductive; (h) GYN; (i) skin, soft tissue, and breast; and (j) bone and blood. (2) "Fire department" means any organization located and based in this State that provides rescue, fire suppression, and related activities including any public or government-sponsored organizations, excluding federal agencies, engaged in rescue, fire suppression, and related activities. (3) "Firefighter" means any person, paid or unpaid, who engages in rescue, fire suppression, or related activities, under the supervision of a fire chief or fire department in this State or who is employed by the State Commission of Forestry, South Carolina State Fire, or a forestry district for the purpose of fire protection. The term also includes employees of the State Law Enforcement Division assigned to the Arson Unit who perform arson investigation, fire-scene origin and cause determination, evidence collection, or related law-enforcement functions that routinely expose them to the same hazards and carcinogenic environments encountered by firefighters. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----